Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-306
Commissioner
of Education; State Department of Education; administrative head; duties.

The Commissioner of Education shall be the administrative head
of the State Department of Education and as such shall (1) have the authority to delegate administrative
and supervisory functions to the members of the staff of the department, (2)
establish and maintain an appropriate system of personnel administration for
the department, (3) prescribe such administrative rules and regulations as
are necessary for the proper execution of duties and responsibilities placed
upon him or her, (4)
perform all duties prescribed by the Legislature in accordance with the policies
adopted by the State Board of Education,
and (5) faithfully execute the policies and directives of the State Board
of Education.

Laws 1953, c. 320, § 13, p. 1060;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-333;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 134;

Laws 2009, LB549, § 14.